data/giellatekno/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
 Portugaalija N_portugaalija ;
 aapõ N_aapõ ;
 ahaz N_puhaz ;
 aitõ N_aitõ ;
 alõin N_alõin ;
 angõriaz N_angõriaz ;
 asfi N_asfi ;
 auči N_auči ;
 bašn̕i N_bašn̕i ;
 biskvittõ N_biskvittõ ;
 bruussõ N_klaassõ ;
 bulipää N_pää ;
 butkõ N_l̕iitkõ ;
 dovariššõ N_dovariššõ ;
 enči N_enči ;
 famil̕ N_famil̕ ;
 fraak N_fraak ;
 hammõz N_hammõz ;
 hapo N_hapo ;
 häülütüs N_häülütüs ;
 hüppü N_hüppü ;
 itkuri N_bagaži ;
 ivusõd N_ivusõd ;
 ičä N_ičä ;
 jaanikukkõ N_biblioteekkõ ;
 jevi N_greebeni ;
 järčü N_järčü ;
 jõutu N_jõutu ;
 kaatsõd N_kaatsõd ;
 kahs N_kahs ;
 kahõsa N_kahõsa ;
 kalliz N_kalliz ;
 kamin N_bank ;
 kanfetti N_dokumentti ;
 kangõz N_kangõz ;
 kannõl N_kannõl ;
 kasõ N_kasõ ;
 katõ N_katõ ;
 kauniz N_kauniz ;
 kaõ N_kaõ ;
 kelkkõ N_borovikkõ ;
 kitai N_kitai ;
 kittsi N_kittsi ;
 klaassõ N_klaassõ ;
 koffi N_koffi ;
 koi N_koi ;
 koivu N_airo ;
 komferenttsi N_kittsi ;
 komit̕et N_komit̕et ;
 koollud N_koollud ;
 koorrõ N_koorrõ ;
 kuha N_kuha ;
 kuivõ N_bukvõ ;
 kultõ N_kultõ ;
 kurp N_kurp ;
 kursi N_kursi ;
 kusi N_kusi ;
 kuto N_kuto ;
 kuu N_kuu ;
 kuusi N_kuusi ;
 kuuvvaiz N_kuuvvaiz ;
 kuõ N_kuõ ;
 kõik N_kõik ;
 kõlmaz N_kõlmaz ;
 kõlmõd N_kõlmõd ;
 kõva N_kõva ;
 laatko N_kotko ;
 lad̕d̕uz N_jalgõz ;
 lafkõ N_lafkõ ;
 lahti N_lahti ;
 lainõ N_az̕z̕õ ;
 lammõz N_hammõz ;
 latõšši N_karjušši ;
 lauto N_lauto ;
 leipe N_leipe ;
 liha N_baldõhina ;
 liippõ N_liippõ ;
 liittsõ N_inostranttsõ ;
 liivõkõz N_bul̕bukõz ;
 lintu N_lento ;
 lisä N_lisä ;
 lohko N_alku ;
 lootõ N_lootõ ;
 luiskõ N_luiskõ ;
 lumi N_lumi ;
 lähe N_lähe ;
 läikk N_läikk ;
 läkine N_läkine ;
 lõnkõ N_aikõ ;
 lõppu N_lippu ;
 lõunõ N_lõunõ ;
 lühüd N_lühüd ;
 l̕iitkõ N_l̕iitkõ ;
 maa N_maa ;
 mahsu N_mahsu ;
 mahsõ N_mahsõ ;
 makka N_kanka ;
 mettse N_mettse ;
 mokom N_mokom ;
 mokomõin N_čimolain ;
 moškõ N_moškõ ;
 muna N_maamuna ;
 murõ N_murhõ ;
 musikko N_flakku ;
 musikõz N_bul̕bukõz ;
 mussõ N_mussõ ;
 muzõkantti N_dokumentti ;
 märännü N_märännü ;
 mätä N_mätä ;
 müüjä N_läsijä ;
 nagriz N_makuz ;
 nel̕l̕äz N_nel̕l̕äz ;
 nenä N_nenä ;
 niskõ N_kraaskõ ;
 nätel̕i N_greebeni ;
 nõki N_laki ;
 olud N_olud ;
 oonõ N_oonõ ;
 paha N_paha ;
 pakkõin N_koivuin ;
 partõ N_partõ ;
 passi N_passi ;
 peremmeez N_peremmeez ;
 pii N_pii ;
 pilvi N_irvi ;
 plehku N_alku ;
 poduškõ N_poduškõ ;
 poolõz N_poolõz ;
 portnoi N_moodnoi ;
 porttu N_hattu ;
 postõ N_bukvõ ;
 poutõ N_poutõ ;
 poštaljon N_poštaljon ;
 poštimarkkõ N_borovikkõ ;
 prostoi N_moodnoi ;
 puhaz N_puhaz ;
 pukki N_kokki ;
 puu N_pihlpuu ;
 pähčen N_pähčen ;
 pää N_pää ;
 põlto N_põlto ;
 põrzõz N_põrzõz ;
 põski N_põski ;
 pühä N_pühä ;
 püütö N_püütö ;
 raadio N_raadio ;
 rahakõz N_mõnikõz ;
 rahvõz N_pal̕l̕õz ;
 rakõ N_rakõ ;
 rantõ N_pintõ ;
 raskõz N_raskõz ;
 ratiz N_ratiz ;
 rihenneüz N_rihenneüz ;
 riittõ N_kand̕idaattõ ;
 rikaz N_rikaz ;
 rissi N_rissi ;
 rissimä N_rissimä ;
 rokkõ N_biblioteekkõ ;
 rookõ N_poikõ ;
 rooppõ N_rooppõ ;
 räpäle N_räpäle ;
 rüiz N_rüiz ;
 seemen N_seemen ;
 selče N_selče ;
 seppe N_seppe ;
 sese N_sese ;
 siipi N_siipi ;
 siitiä N_kerkiä ;
 sika N_sika ;
 siltõ N_siltõ ;
 siso N_siso ;
 skopkõ N_propkõ ;
 slona N_slona ;
 sooli N_juuri ;
 suku N_lako ;
 suukkuri N_bagaži ;
 sõbrõ N_az̕z̕õ ;
 sõpa N_rapa ;
 sõrmuz N_jalgõz ;
 sõta N_sata ;
 süčüzü N_löülü ;
 talo N_airo ;
 tarkuz N_tarkuz ;
 telefona N_baldõhina ;
 toho N_toho ;
 tuisku N_rusko ;
 tühje N_eine ;
 tüttö N_rätte ;
 uhsi N_uhsi ;
 ukrainalain N_čimolain ;
 ukroppi N_lamppi ;
 vaahto N_suuto ;
 vattsõ N_inostranttsõ ;
 vene N_pere ;
 venäläin N_entin ;
 vesi N_mesi ;
 vetelüz N_vetelüz ;
 veto N_mato ;
 vimpõ N_vimpõ ;
 vinkõ N_aikõ ;
 voosi N_uusi ;
 väči N_väči ;
 võõrõz N_pal̕l̕õz ;
 vüü N_tüü ;
 zanavesk N_bank ;
 ärče N_ärče ;
 õmpõja N_kompjutera ;
 õnki N_kurki ;
 õnni N_sarvi ;
 õnnõto N_õnnõto ;
 ülči N_ülči ;
 čeeli N_iiri ;
 čenče N_čenče ;
 česä N_pesä ;
 čeväd N_čeväd ;
 čämmel N_čämmel ;
 čärpein N_nüčüin ;
 čäčüd N_čäčüd ;
 čülä N_čülä ;
 čümme N_čümme ;
 čümmenäz N_čümmenäz ;
